Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0988.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 53c. If the July or December board of review denies a claim for exemption under section 7u, the person claiming the exemption may appeal that decision to the Michigan tax tribunal. within 30 days of The appeal must be filed not later than 35 days after the denial. For purposes of an appeal delivered by the United States Postal Service, the appeal is timely if the postmark is on or before the deadline prescribed in this section.